Utah statutes.
62A-4a-121.   Reimbursement of motor vehicle insurance coverage for foster child.

(1)  Within the amounts appropriated to the division for the purposes described in this section, the division may reimburse a foster parent for providing owner's or operator's security covering a foster child's operation of a motor vehicle in amounts required under Section 31A-22-304 if the foster child is in the legal custody of the division.

(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division shall make rules establishing:

(a)  a procedure for providing the reimbursement to a foster parent described in Subsection (1);

(b)  eligibility requirements for a foster parent to qualify for a reimbursement under this section; and

(c)  a method for determining the amount of reimbursement that a foster parent is eligible to receive under this section.

(3)  The division shall report to the Transportation Interim Committee no later than November 30, 2009:

(a)  the number of foster children in the legal custody of the Division of Child and Family Services who have been issued a driver license;

(b)  the results and impacts on the division and on foster parents signing for a foster child to receive a driver license; and

(c)  the division's cost of reimbursing foster parents for providing owner's or operator's security in accordance with Subsection (1).

